Washington statutes.
RCW 11.64.016

Security may be required.

If the surviving partner or partners commit waste, or if it appears to the court that it is for the best interest of the estate of the decedent, such court may, after a hearing, order the surviving partner or partners to give security for the faithful settlement of the partnership affairs and the payment to the personal representative of any amount due the estate.

[ 1977 ex.s. c 234 s 15; 1965 c 145 s 11.64.016. Prior: 1951 c 197 s 3.]

NOTES:

Application, effective date—Severability—1977 ex.s. c 234: See notes following RCW 11.20.020.